North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 6. Qualifications of Voters.

§ 163-54.
Registration a prerequisite to voting.

Only such persons as are legally registered shall be entitled to vote in any primary or election held under this Chapter.

History.
1901, c. 89, s. 12; Rev., s. 4317; C.S., s. 5938; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-55.
Qualifications to vote; exclusion from electoral franchise.

Residence Period for State Elections. — Every person born in the United States, and every person who has been naturalized, and who shall have resided in the State of North Carolina and in the precinct in which the person offers to vote for 30 days next
preceding an election, shall, if otherwise qualified as prescribed in this Chapter, be qualified to vote in the precinct in which the person resides. Removal from one precinct to another in this State shall not operate to deprive
any person of the right to vote in the precinct from which the person has removed until 30 days after the person’s removal.Except as provided in this Chapter, the following classes of persons shall not be allowed to vote in this
State:

Persons under 18 years of age.

Any person adjudged guilty of a felony against this State or the United States, or adjudged guilty of a felony in another state that also would be a felony if it had been committed in this State, unless that person shall be first restored to the rights
of citizenship in the manner prescribed by law.

Precincts. — For purposes of qualification to vote in an election, a person’s residence in a precinct shall be determined in accordance with

G.S. 163-57

. Qualification to vote in referenda shall be treated the same as qualification for elections to fill offices.

Elections. — For purposes of the 30-day residence requirement to vote in an election in subsection (a) of this section, the term “election” means the day of the primary, second primary, general election, special election, or referendum.

History.
19th amendt. U.S. Const; amendt. State Const., 1920; 1901, c. 89, ss. 14, 15; Rev., ss. 4315, 4316; C.S., ss. 5936, 5937; Ex. Sess. 1920, c. 18, s. 1; 1933, c. 165, s. 4; 1945, c. 758, s. 7; 1955, c. 871, s. 2; 1967, c.
775, s. 1; 1971, c. 1231, s. 1; 1973, c. 793, s. 18; 2005-2, s. 2; 2008-150, s. 5(a); 2009-541, s. 5; 2013-381, s. 49.1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Cross References.

As to restoration of citizenship, see Chapter 13.

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-55. Qualifications to vote; exclusion from electoral franchise.

Residence Period for State Elections. — Every person born in the United States, and every person who has been naturalized, and who shall have resided in the State of North Carolina and in the precinct, ward, or other election district in which the person
offers to vote for 30 days next preceding an election, shall, if otherwise qualified as prescribed in this Chapter, be qualified to vote in any election held in this State. Removal from one precinct, ward, or other election district
to another in this State shall not operate to deprive any person of the right to vote in the precinct, ward, or other election district from which he has removed until 30 days after the person’s removal.

Persons under 18 years of age.

Any person adjudged guilty of a felony against this State or the United States, or adjudged guilty of a felony in another state that also would be a felony if it had been committed in this State, unless that person shall be first restored to the rights
of citizenship in the manner prescribed by law.

Precincts and Election Districts. — For purposes of qualification to vote in an election, a person’s residence in a precinct, ward, or election district shall be determined in accordance with

G.S. 163-57

. When an election district encompasses more than one precinct, then for purposes of those offices to be elected from that election district a person shall also be deemed to be resident in the election district which
includes the precinct in which that person resides. An election district may include a portion of a county, an entire county, a portion of the State, or the entire State. When a precinct has been divided among two or more election
districts for purposes of elections to certain offices, then with respect to elections to those offices a person shall be deemed to be resident in only that election district which includes the area of the precinct in which that
person resides. Qualification to vote in referenda shall be treated the same as qualification for elections to fill offices.

Elections. — For purposes of the 30-day residence requirement to vote in an election in subsection (a) of this section, the term “election” means the day of the primary, second primary, general election, special election, or referendum.

Except as provided in this Chapter, the following classes of persons shall not be allowed to vote in this State:

§ 163-56.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 793, s. 19.

§ 163-57.
Residence defined for registration and voting.

All election officials in determining the residence of a person offering to register or vote, shall be governed by the following rules, so far as they may apply:

That place shall be considered the residence of a person in which that person’s habitation is fixed, and to which, whenever that person is absent, that person has the intention of returning[, subject to the following:].

In the event that a person’s habitation is divided by a State, county, municipal, precinct, ward, or other election district, then the location of the bedroom or usual sleeping area for that person with respect to the location of the boundary line at
issue shall be controlling as the residency of that person.

If the person disputes the determination of residency, the person may request a hearing before the county board of elections making the determination of residency. The procedures for notice of hearing and the conduct of the hearing shall be as provided
in

G.S. 163-86

. The presentation of an accurate and current determination of a person’s residence and the boundary line at issue by map or other means available shall constitute prima facie evidence of the geographic
location of the residence of that person.

In the event that a person’s residence is not a traditional residence associated with real property, then the location of the usual sleeping area for that person shall be controlling as to the residency of that person. Residence shall be broadly construed
to provide all persons with the opportunity to register and to vote, including stating a mailing address different from residence address.

A person shall not be considered to have lost that person’s residence if that person leaves home and goes into another state, county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other election district of this State, for temporary purposes only, with the intention
of returning.

A person shall not be considered to have gained a residence in any county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other election district of this State, into which that person comes for temporary purposes only, without the intention of making that county, municipality,
precinct, ward, or other election district a permanent place of abode.

If a person removes to another state or county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other election district within this State, with the intention of making that state, county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other election district a permanent residence,
that person shall be considered to have lost residence in the state, county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other election district from which that person has removed.

If a person removes to another state or county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other election district within this State, with the intention of remaining there an indefinite time and making that state, county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other
election district that person’s place of residence, that person shall be considered to have lost that person’s place of residence in this State, county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other election district from which that person
has removed, notwithstanding that person may entertain an intention to return at some future time.

If a person goes into another state, county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other election district, or into the District of Columbia, and while there exercises the right of a citizen by voting in an election, that person shall be considered to have
lost residence in that State, county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other election district from which that person removed.

School teachers who remove to a county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other election district in this State for the purpose of teaching in the schools of that county temporarily and with the intention or expectation of returning during vacation periods
to live where their parents or other relatives reside in this State and who do not have the intention of becoming residents of the county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other election district to which they have moved to teach,
for purposes of registration and voting shall be considered residents of the county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other election district in which their parents or other relatives reside.

If a person removes to the District of Columbia or other federal territory to engage in the government service, that person shall not be considered to have lost residence in this State during the period of such service unless that person votes in the
place to which the person removed, and the place at which that person resided at the time of that person’s removal shall be considered and held to be the place of residence.

If a person removes to a county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other election district to engage in the service of the State government, that person shall not be considered to have lost residence in the county, municipality, precinct, ward, or other
election district from which that person removed, unless that person votes in the place to which the person removed, and the place at which that person resided at the time of that person’s removal shall be considered and held to
be the place of residence.

The establishment of a secondary residence by an elected official outside the district of the elected official shall not constitute prima facie evidence of a change of residence.

For the purpose of voting a spouse shall be eligible to establish a separate domicile.

So long as a student intends to make the student’s home in the community where the student is physically present for the purpose of attending school while the student is attending school and has no intent to return to the student’s former home after graduation,
the student may claim the college community as the student’s domicile. The student need not also intend to stay in the college community beyond graduation in order to establish domicile there. This subdivision is intended to codify
the case law.

History.
19th amendt. U.S. Const; amendt. State Const., 1920; 1901, c. 89, s. 15; Rev., s. 4316; C.S., s. 5937; Ex. Sess. 1920, c. 18, s. 1; 1933, c. 165, s. 4; 1945, c. 758, s. 7; 1955, c. 871, s. 2; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1981, c.
184; 1991, c. 727, s. 5.1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 22; 2001-316, s. 1; 2005-428, s. 3(b); 2006-262, s. 2.1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-58.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 563, s. 3.

§ 163-59.
Right to participate or vote in party primary.

No person shall be entitled to vote or otherwise participate in the primary election of any political party unless that person complies with all of the following:

Is a registered voter.

Has declared and has had recorded on the registration book or record the fact that the voter affiliates with the political party in whose primary the voter proposes to vote or participate.

Is in good faith a member of that party. Notwithstanding the previous paragraph, any unaffiliated voter who is authorized under

G.S. 163-119

may also vote in the primary if the voter is otherwise eligible to vote in that primary except for subdivisions (2) and (3) of the previous paragraph.

Any person who will become qualified by age to register and vote in the general election for which the primary is held, even though not so qualified by the date of the primary, shall be entitled to register for the primary and general election prior to
the primary and then to vote in the primary after being registered. Such person may register not earlier than 60 days nor later than the last day for making application to register under G.S. 163-82.6(d) prior to the primary.
In addition, persons who will become qualified by age to register and vote in the general election for which the primary is held, who do not register during the special period may register to vote after such period as if they
were qualified on the basis of age, but until they are qualified by age to vote, they may vote only in primary elections.

History.
1915, c. 101, s. 5; 1917, c. 218; C.S., s. 6027; 1959, c. 1203, s. 6; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1971, c. 1166, s. 4; 1973, c. 793, s. 20; 1981, c. 33, s. 1; 1983, c. 324, s. 3; 1987, c. 408, s. 4; c. 457, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess.,
1992), c. 1032, s. 5; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 23; 2007-391, s. 28; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2009-541, s. 6; 2013-381, s. 16.2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Cross References.

As to time for challenge other than on day of primary or election, see

G.S. 163-84

.

As to hearing on challenge made on day of primary or election, see

G.S. 163-88

.

As to definition of “political party” and creation of new parties, see

G.S. 163-96

.

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-59. Right to participate or vote in party primary.

No person shall be entitled to vote or otherwise participate in the primary election of any political party unless that person complies with all of the following:

Is a registered voter.

Has declared and has had recorded on the registration book or record the fact that the voter affiliates with the political party in whose primary the voter proposes to vote or participate.

Is in good faith a member of that party.

Notwithstanding the previous paragraph, any unaffiliated voter who is authorized under

G.S. 163-119

may also vote in the primary if the voter is otherwise eligible to vote in that primary except for subdivisions (2) and (3) of the previous paragraph.

Any person who will become qualified by age to register and vote in the general election for which the primary is held, even though not so qualified by the date of the primary, shall be entitled to register for the primary and general election prior to
the primary and then to vote in the primary after being registered. Such person may register not earlier than 60 days nor later than the last day for making application to register under

G.S. 163-82.6

(c) prior to the primary. In addition, persons who will become qualified by age to register and vote in the general election for which the primary is held, who do not register during the special period may register to
vote after such period as if they were qualified on the basis of age, but until they are qualified by age to vote, they may vote only in primary elections. Such a person also may register and vote in the primary and general election
pursuant to

G.S. 163-82.6

A(f).

§§ 163-60 through 163-64.

Reserved for future codification purposes.